Alabama, session 2026rs, HB314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-5C-2, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
Page 1

amended to read as follows:
HB314 INTRODUCED
"§32-5C-2
(a) Except as provided in this chapter, a person shall
not operate a motor vehicle registered in this state under
either of the following conditions:
(1) With material or glazing applied or affixed to the
front windshield which reduces light transmission through the
front windshield.
(2) With material or glazing applied or affixed to the
rear windshield or the side or door windows which reduce
reduces light transmission through the rear windshield or side
windows to less than 32 percent or increase increases light
reflectance to more than 20 percent, with a measurement
tolerance of at least 3 three percent. The light transmission
shall be measured with a device or instrument capable of
measuring light transmission before a person may be charged
with a violation of this section, and the officer shall be
equipped with such a meter before stopping the driver.
(b) This section does not apply to any personal use
vehicles belonging to, and occupied by, any of the following:
(1)active Active or retired state, local, or federal
law enforcement officers.
(2) County or municipal prosecutors.
(c) All of the following individuals active or retired
state, local, or federal law enforcement officers shall carry
law enforcement proper employment identification while driving
their personal use vehicles referenced in subsection (b):
(1) Active state, local, or federal law enforcement
officers.
Page 2

officers.
HB314 INTRODUCED
(2) Retired state, local, or federal law enforcement
officers.
(3) County or municipal prosecutors."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3